California, session 20252026, AB1477.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12096.6.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:12096.6.6. This article shall be repealed on January 1, 2030. 2031.SECTION 1.Section 12096.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:12096.2.(a)The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, also known as “GO-Biz,” is established in state government within the Governor’s office. The office shall be under the direct control of a director, who shall be responsible to the Governor.(b)The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development who shall perform all duties, exercise all powers, assume and discharge all responsibilities, and carry out and effect all purposes vested by law in the office, including contracting for professional or consultant services in connection with the work of the office.(c)The salary of the Director of the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall be fixed pursuant to Section 12001.